Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5555.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 64H of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting a new
section as follows:
2A. Local excise tax upon retail sales; distribution; effective date upon acceptance by
municipality; reports
Section 2A. (a) A city or town which accepts this section in the manner provided in
section 4 of chapter 4 may, in addition to the obligation to collect an excise tax as set forth in
Section 2 of this chapter, impose an additional excise upon retail sales by any vendor of tangible
personal property or of services performed at a rate not to exceed 5 per cent of the gross receipts
of the vendor from all such sales originating in the city or town, except as otherwise provided in
chapter 64H of the General Laws. The vendor shall pay the local sales tax imposed under this
section to the commissioner at the same time and in the same manner as the sales tax due to the
commonwealth under section 2.
of 2

(b) All sums received by the commissioner under this section shall, at least quarterly, be
distributed, credited and paid by the state treasurer upon certification of the commissioner to
each city or town that has accepted this section in proportion to the amount of the sums received
from the sales of retail sales or service in that city or town. Any city or town seeking to dispute
the commissioner's calculation of its distribution under this subsection shall notify the
commissioner, in writing, not later than 1 year from the date the tax was distributed by the
commissioner to the city or town.
(c) This section shall take effect in a municipality on the first day of the calendar quarter
following 30 days after its acceptance by the municipality or on the first day of a later calendar
quarter that the city or town may designate.
(d) Notwithstanding any provisions in section 21 of chapter 62C to the contrary, the
commissioner may make available to cities and towns any information necessary for
administration of the excise imposed by this section including, but not limited to, a report of the
amount of local option sales tax on retail sales collected in the aggregate by each city or town
under this section in the preceding fiscal year, and the identification of each individual vendor
collecting local option sales tax on retail sales collected under this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage
of 2